Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 12
LEVY AND COLLECTION OF TAXES

Cross references:

For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see § 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution.

32-1-1201. Procedure.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall determine in each year the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the special district, and shall fix a rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of valuation for assessment of taxable property within the special district and together with other revenues, will raise the amount required by the special district annually to supply funds for paying expenses of organization and the costs of constructing, operating, and maintaining the facilities and improvements of the special district and to pay in full, promptly, when due, all interest on and principal of bonds and other obligations of the special district. In the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies, an additional levy may be made as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

The board, in certifying annual levies, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the ensuing year as provided in its contracts, maturing bonds and interest on bonds, and deficiencies and defaults of prior years and shall make ample provision for the payment thereof. If the moneys produced from such levies, together with other revenues of the special district, are not sufficient to pay punctually the annual installments on its contracts or bonds, and interest thereon, and to pay defaults and deficiencies, the board shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary for such purposes, and, notwithstanding any limitation provided in part 11 of this article, such taxes shall be made and continue to be levied until the indebtedness of the district is fully paid.

In accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., the board shall certify to the board of county commissioners of each county within the special district, or having a portion of its territory within the district, the rate so fixed in order that, at the time and in the manner required by law for the levying of taxes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within the special district. When necessary, a special district shall, with respect to an increased mill levy, comply with the requirements of part 3 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1607, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-1202. County officers to levy and collect - lien.

It is the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within each county to levy the taxes provided by section 32-1-1201 (1) and (2). It is the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect such taxes at the time and in the form and manner and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected and when collected to pay the same to the special district ordering the levy and collection. The payment of such collections shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the special district or paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the special district. All taxes levied under this part 12, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same shall constitute, until paid, a perpetual lien on and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be on a parity with the tax lien of other general taxes.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1608, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-1203. Sale for delinquencies.

If the taxes levied are not paid, delinquent real property shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of said taxes, interest, and penalties in the manner provided by the statutes of this state for selling real property for the nonpayment of general taxes. If there are no bids at said tax sale for the property so offered, said property shall be struck off to the county, and the county shall account to the special district in the same manner as provided by law for accounting for school, town, and city taxes. Delinquent personal property shall be distrained and sold as provided by law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1608, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For distraint and sale of personal property, see § 39-10-111; for the sale of tax liens, see article 11 of title 39.

32-1-1204. Liability of property included or excluded from district.

All real property included within, or excluded from, a special district shall thereafter be subject to the levy of taxes for the payment of its proportionate share of any indebtedness of the district outstanding at the time of inclusion or exclusion as provided in parts 4 and 5 of this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1608, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-2-123 as it existed prior to 1981.